North Dakota, session 69, SB2006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the North
Dakota aeronautics commission for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the North Dakota
aeronautics commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as
follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $1,789,878 $132,794 $1,922,672
New and vacant FTE pool 0 20,495 20,495
Operating expenses 3,285,000 (119) 3,284,881
Grants 27,100,000 93,775,000 120,875,000
Total all funds $32,174,878 $93,928,170 $126,103,048
Less other funds 31,699,878 93,928,170 125,628,048
Total general fund $475,000 $0 $475,000
Full-time equivalent positions 7.00 0.00 7.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description Other Funds
Generational airport projects $90,000,000
Total $90,000,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The North
Dakota aeronautics commission may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line
item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds
from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. OTHER FUNDS - AIRPORT INFRASTRUCTURE FUND - AIRPORT GRANTS -
EXEMPTION. The other funds appropriation in section 1 of this Act includes $20,000,000 from the
airport infrastructure fund for the aeronautics commission to provide grants to airports during the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. Section 54-44.1-11 does not apply to this
funding, and any funds not spent by June 30, 2027, must be continued into the biennium beginning
July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2029, and may be expended only for providing grants to airports.
SECTION 5. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
GENERATIONAL AIRPORT PROJECTS - EXEMPTION - LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

S. B. NO. 2006 - PAGE 2
1. The other funds appropriation in section 1 of this Act includes $90,000,000 from the strategic
investment and improvements fund for generational airport projects during the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
2. Section 54-44.1-11 does not apply to the funding identified in this section and appropriated in
section 1 of this Act, and any funds not spent by June 30, 2027, must be continued into the
biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2029, and may be expended only for
generational airport projects.
3. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that state funds not be used to replace
any federal grant funds applied for but not received for a generational airport project. It is
further the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that, of the funding identified in this
section, $45,000,000 is for the Fargo commercial terminal expansion project, $20,000,000 is
for the Grand Forks primary runway reconstruction project, and $25,000,000 is for the
Dickinson terminal construction project.
SECTION 6. DICKINSON AIRPORT PROJECT DEBT REPAYMENTS. During the 2025-27
biennium, the city of Dickinson shall use funding allocated to it from the hub city debt relief funding pool
under section 57-51-15 for debt repayments related to debt incurred for a project at the Dickinson
airport.
SECTION 7. EXEMPTION - INTERNATIONAL PEACE GARDEN AIRPORT REHABILITATION
PROJECT. The sum of $3,750,000 appropriated from federal funds and special funds for the
International Peace Garden airport pavement rehabilitation project in section 1 of chapter 6 of the 2023
Session Laws is not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and any unexpended funds from
these appropriations are available and may be expended during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2006 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2006.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 8 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State